ess.lexc
LEXICON PersonalPronoun

!------------------------|-----------------------------|--------------------------------|----------------|
!        singular        |             plural          |              dual              |                |
!------------------------|-----------------------------|--------------------------------|----------------|
!                        |                             |                                |  ! 1st Person  |
whanga      NounPostbase1;  whangkuta     NounPostbase1;  whangkutung      NounPostbase1;  ! Abs/Rel     |
whangamnun  NounPostbase1;  whangamnun    NounPostbase1;  whangkutegnun    NounPostbase1;  ! Ter         |
whangamkun  NounPostbase1;  whangkutgun   NounPostbase1;  whangkutegnegun  NounPostbase1;  ! Via         |
whangamtun  NounPostbase1;  whangkutestun NounPostbase1;  whangkutegestun  NounPostbase1;  ! Equ         |
!------------------------|-----------------------------|--------------------------------|----------------|
!                        |                             |                                |  ! 2nd Person  |
elpek       NounPostbase1;  elpesi        NounPostbase1;  elpetek          NounPostbase1;  ! Abs/Rel     |
elpenun     NounPostbase1;  elpesinun     NounPostbase1;  elpetegnun       NounPostbase1;  ! Ter         |
elpegun     NounPostbase1;  elpesigun     NounPostbase1;  elpetegnegun     NounPostbase1;  ! Via         |
elpetun     NounPostbase1;  elpesistun    NounPostbase1;  elpetegestun     NounPostbase1;  ! Equ         |
!------------------------|-----------------------------|--------------------------------|----------------|
!                        |                             |                                |  ! 3rd Person  |
ellnga      NounPostbase1;  ellngit       NounPostbase1;  elkek            NounPostbase1;  ! Abs/Rel     |
ellngan     NounPostbase1;  ellgita       NounPostbase1;  elkek            NounPostbase1;  ! Rel         |
ellnganun   NounPostbase1;  ellngitnun    NounPostbase1;  elkegkenun       NounPostbase1;  ! Ter         |
ellngakun   NounPostbase1;  ellngitgun    NounPostbase1;  elekegkenkun     NounPostbase1;  ! Via         |
ellngatun   NounPostbase1;  ellngistun    NounPostbase1;  elkegestun       NounPostbase1;  ! Equ         |
                            ellngitestun  NounPostbase1;                                |  ! Equ         |
!------------------------|-----------------------------|--------------------------------|----------------|
!                        |                             |                                |  ! 4th Person  |
ellmi       NounPostbase1;  ellmeng       NounPostbase1;  ellmeng          NounPostbase1;  ! Abs/Rel     |
ellminun    NounPostbase1;  ellmeggnun    NounPostbase1;  ellmegnun        NounPostbase1;  ! Ter         |
                                                          ellmegtenun      NounPostbase1;  ! Ter         |
ellmikun    NounPostbase1;  ellmegteggun  NounPostbase1;  ellmegtegnegun   NounPostbase1;  ! Via         |
ellmitun    NounPostbase1;  ellmegestun   NounPostbase1;  elmegestun       NounPostbase1;  ! Equ         |
!------------------------|-----------------------------|--------------------------------|----------------|



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!               !!!
!!!   Enclitics   !!!
!!!               !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON EncliticOrEnd
0:0               #;

-lli[Encl]:lli    EncliticOrEnd;
-llu[Encl]:llu    EncliticOrEnd;
-mi[Encl]:mi      EncliticOrEnd;
-ngam[Encl]:ngam  EncliticOrEnd;
-nguq[Encl]:nguq  EncliticOrEnd;
-qaa[Encl]:qaa    EncliticOrEnd;
-qun[Encl]:qun    EncliticOrEnd;
-sa[Encl]:sa      EncliticOrEnd;
-ta[Encl]:ta      EncliticOrEnd;
-tuq[Encl]:tuq    EncliticOrEnd;
-wha[Encl]:wha    EncliticOrEnd;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!              !!!
!!!   Numerals   !!!
!!!              !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Numeral

aghvinleg              	NounPostbase1; ! six
ataasigh               	NounPostbase1; ! one
estamaneng ingluleg    	NounPostbase1; ! nine
estamat                	NounPostbase1; ! four
maaghraghvinleg        	NounPostbase1; ! seven
maalghug               	NounPostbase1; ! two
pingayuneng ingluleg   	NounPostbase1; ! eight
pingayut               	NounPostbase1; ! three
tallimat               	NounPostbase1; ! five

LEXICON Particle
aaqunqun              	EncliticOrEnd; ! try it anyway; dare
aataqun               	EncliticOrEnd; ! do it anyway; give it a try; let's
aawhkaghhaaneng       	EncliticOrEnd; ! for ages (in the past); for quite a while now
agaten                	EncliticOrEnd; ! must be the case; unenthusiastic
aghneq                	EncliticOrEnd; ! day; today (as a particle)
ahaaw                 	EncliticOrEnd; ! is anyone there?
allameng              	EncliticOrEnd; ! more; some more; again
amalleqa              	EncliticOrEnd; ! also; on the other hand
ang                   	EncliticOrEnd; ! here, take it
asanut                	EncliticOrEnd; ! as long as; at least
ataw                  	EncliticOrEnd; ! do it anyway; give it a try
awen                  	EncliticOrEnd; ! usually; often; intermittently; frequently
awnepa                	EncliticOrEnd; ! probably; maybe; must be
ellmaaghaghhagh*       	EncliticOrEnd; ! a little bit more
enankinam             	EncliticOrEnd; ! oh no, not again!
en-nanaayuq           	EncliticOrEnd; ! maybe; perhaps
esghaghhu             	EncliticOrEnd; ! look!; consider!
giniwan               	EncliticOrEnd; ! expression of hopeless expectation or longing
huk                   	EncliticOrEnd; ! oops!; watch out!; oh dear!
ihik                  	EncliticOrEnd; ! just like that
iitekqun                EncliticOrEnd; ! perhaps; usually
ikiifsin              	EncliticOrEnd; ! at last; finally
imamta                	EncliticOrEnd; ! even though I told him/her...
inglugtun             	EncliticOrEnd; ! with both sides; with both arms
ipapik                	EncliticOrEnd; ! correctness; truth; reality; indeed; really; truthfully
itararat                EncliticOrEnd; ! danger!
iyamsiqanaghhalek     	EncliticOrEnd; ! thank you very much; oh, how grateful that makes one!
kakuuy                  EncliticOrEnd; ! oh my!
keka                  	EncliticOrEnd; ! ouch!
ketanqusnaq           	EncliticOrEnd; ! running fast
kipiinaghmun          	EncliticOrEnd; ! continuously in the opposite direction
kuukguuy              	EncliticOrEnd; ! oh!
legan                 	EncliticOrEnd; ! and so; so that; sure!; go ahead and do it!
llaaghinaan           	EncliticOrEnd; ! good thing!
maasisu               	EncliticOrEnd; ! even; however; already; moreover
maateqwaaqun          	EncliticOrEnd; ! a little while from now; shortly
milegnatun            	EncliticOrEnd; ! causing sadness
nallegha                EncliticOrEnd; ! too much!; too long!
naqam                 	EncliticOrEnd; ! but instead; such being the case; consequent to the fact that; in as much as
ngaalgeliigteng       	EncliticOrEnd; ! anywhere; everywhere; back an forth
nuuskagllagan         	EncliticOrEnd; ! suddenly
periiwell             	EncliticOrEnd; ! let
puuru                 	EncliticOrEnd; ! contrary to what one might have expected or wanted; on the other hand; instead; ironically
qakuqwaaqu          	EncliticOrEnd; ! sometime later
qavnganghhaq          	EncliticOrEnd; ! recently; a few days ago
qayughmi              	EncliticOrEnd; ! whatever you think; it's up to you; how then?
qemall                	EncliticOrEnd; ! could be or must be; might happen; finally; at last
quganakruggaghmeng    	EncliticOrEnd; ! how dare he!
quyanaghhalek         	EncliticOrEnd; ! what a happy occurrence!
saami                 	EncliticOrEnd; ! I don't know; it doesn't register in my mind
satun                 	EncliticOrEnd; ! somehow; sometimes
sitiiwen              	EncliticOrEnd; ! with certainty; as compensation
taameng               	EncliticOrEnd; ! no wonder!; so that's why!
tanem                 	EncliticOrEnd; ! finally; once again
tawatestaghhiinaq     	EncliticOrEnd; ! like that all the time
tum                    	EncliticOrEnd; ! bang
uksaaqun              	EncliticOrEnd; ! next autumn
unuk                  	EncliticOrEnd; ! night; last night
uugg                  	EncliticOrEnd; ! gross! 
uzimun                	EncliticOrEnd; ! in a circle; circumferentially; all around
wanlegingam           	EncliticOrEnd; ! and yet all the more
weni                  	EncliticOrEnd; ! come on; go ahead; better do it
whani                 	EncliticOrEnd; ! right here
yaghlegi              	EncliticOrEnd; ! instead; but; yet; contrary to expectation
yeqayngan             	EncliticOrEnd; ! not again
LEXICON Demonstrative
                             tazigna       EncliticOrEnd;  taamna        EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Abs Pron         |
awaken       EncliticOrEnd;  iingken       EncliticOrEnd;  amaken        EncliticOrEnd;  ! Abl_Mod Adv            |
taawhken     EncliticOrEnd;                                taamken       EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Abl_Mod Adv      |
taagkut      EncliticOrEnd;  tazikegkut    EncliticOrEnd;  taakemkut     EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Ab/Rel Pl Pron   |
taaggun      EncliticOrEnd;  tazikagun     EncliticOrEnd;  taakmagun     EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Via Adv          |
espagumi     EncliticOrEnd;  espikumi      EncliticOrEnd;  espamumi      EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Loc Pron         |  
paaggun      EncliticOrEnd;  pikagun       EncliticOrEnd;  pamagun       EncliticOrEnd;  ! Via Adv                |
espagavek    EncliticOrEnd;  espikavek     EncliticOrEnd;  espamavek     EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Ter Adv          |
                                                           espaamken     EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Abl_Mod Adv      |
taan'gumi    EncliticOrEnd;  eskanumi      EncliticOrEnd;  esamumi       EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Loc Sg Pron      |
uun'ggun     EncliticOrEnd;  kaan'ggun     EncliticOrEnd;  samagun       EncliticOrEnd;  ! Via Adv                |
taan'gavek   EncliticOrEnd;  eskanavek     EncliticOrEnd;  esamavek      EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Ter Adv          |
                             uugna         EncliticOrEnd;  sakemna       EncliticOrEnd;  ! Abs Sg Pron            |
                             taawyuq       EncliticOrEnd;  esakemyuq     EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Voc Sg           |
                             kaanken       EncliticOrEnd;                                ! Abl_Mod Adv            |
                             teskaan'ggun  EncliticOrEnd;  tesakmagun    EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Via Adv          |
qaawyuq      EncliticOrEnd;  kiiwyuq       EncliticOrEnd;  qaamyuq       EncliticOrEnd;  ! Voc Sg                 |
esqaawyuq    EncliticOrEnd;  eskiiwyuq     EncliticOrEnd;  esqaamyuq     EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Voc Sg           |
qaawhken     EncliticOrEnd;  kiiwhken      EncliticOrEnd;  qamaken       EncliticOrEnd;  ! Abl_Mod Adv            |
esqaawhun    EncliticOrEnd;  eskiiwhun     EncliticOrEnd;  esqamagun     EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Via Adv          |
qaagna       EncliticOrEnd;                                qakmena       EncliticOrEnd;  ! Abs Sg Pron            |
esqaagyuq    EncliticOrEnd;                                esqakemyuq    EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Voc Sg           |
esqawa       EncliticOrEnd;                                esqakma       EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Adv Ptcl         |
esqaagken    EncliticOrEnd;                                esqakmaken    EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Abl_Mod Adv      |
tamatumi     EncliticOrEnd;  taami         EncliticOrEnd;  tazimumi      EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Loc Sg Pron      |
maaken       EncliticOrEnd;  whaken        EncliticOrEnd;  imaken        EncliticOrEnd;  ! Abl_Mod Adv            |
tamaaken     EncliticOrEnd;  tawaken       EncliticOrEnd;  tazimaken     EncliticOrEnd;  ! Anaph Abl_Mod Adv      |  
                             taakwumi       EncliticOrEnd;                               ! Anaph Loc Sg Pron      |
                             taakwani       EncliticOrEnd;                               ! Anaph Loc Adv          |
